Indiana, session 2026, HB1265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 14-8-2-87.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 87.8. "Fees", for purposes of IC 14-19-3-6.5, means
entrance or admission fees that are paid in a county upon or after
entering a state park or state recreation area located in the county.
SECTION 2. IC 14-8-2-91.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 91.6. "First responder", for purposes of
IC 14-19-3-6.5, refers to:
(1) a law enforcement officer (as defined in IC 5-2-1-2(1));
(2) a firefighter, including a volunteer firefighter; or
(3) an emergency medical technician, emergency medical
responder, or paramedic.
SECTION 3. IC 14-19-3-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) A county fiscal body may adopt an ordinance
to impose a surcharge on the fees paid in the county for entry into
2026 IN 1265—LS 6780/DI 150


a state park or state recreation area located in the county. A
county fiscal body that adopts an ordinance under this section shall
notify the director of the department. The department shall report
the surcharge collected under the ordinance on forms approved by
the county treasurer.
(b) The surcharge is equal to an amount of not more than two
dollars ($2) in addition to any fees charged by the department for
entry into the state park or state recreation area. However, the
surcharge may not be imposed on:
(1) a veteran (as defined in IC 10-17-13.5-3);
(2) an individual serving on active duty in any branch of the
armed forces of the United States;
(3) an individual who is at least sixty-five (65) years of age; or
(4) a person who holds an annual pass issued under section 5
of this chapter and members of the person's immediate
family.
(c) The department shall:
(1) begin collecting the surcharge not later than sixty (60)
days after receiving notice under subsection (a) of the
adoption of an ordinance; and
(2) pay the surcharge collected during a month to the county
treasurer not later than the end of the following month.
(d) The surcharge collected by the department and paid to the
county treasurer must, as applicable, be used for one (1) or both of
the following in accordance with the ordinance adopted under
subsection (a):
(1) For purposes related to first responders in the county,
including:
(A) compensation;
(B) purchases of equipment; and
(C) updating of equipment.
(2) Infrastructure improvements, including water quality
improvements.
(e) If:
(1) the state park or state recreation area is located in more
than one (1) county; and
(2) each county in which the state park or state recreation
area is located has passed an ordinance under subsection (a);
the department shall prorate the surcharge and pay a prorated
share to the county treasurer for each county in which the state
park or state recreation area is located.
2026 IN 1265—LS 6780/DI 150